Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB663.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Bodywork Facilities Regulation Act.Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Advertise." The public promotion of a service, by use of printed media, the Internet or other advertising method or medium, to attract and encourage individuals to engage, purchase or use the service referenced in the content of the advertisement."Applicant." An individual or entity acting on the behalf of a bodywork facility to apply for a license. If the applicant is an entity, the term includes each individual officer, director, manager, partner, member, principal owner and any person with at least a 1% financial interest in the entity."Bodywork facility." A place of business where the human body is manipulated through touch or pressure, where the practice of massage and bodywork is conducted on the premises of the business or that represents itself to the public by a title or description of services incorporating the words "bodywork," "massage," "massage therapy," "massage practitioner," "massagist," "masseur" or "masseuse" or other term or modality or an image or photograph depicting the activity or service.20250HB0663PN0670 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) The term includes acupressure, chair massage, craniosacral therapy, deep tissue massage therapy, Hellerwork, manual lymphatic drainage, massage therapy, myofascial release therapy, neuromuscular therapy, Process Acupressure, Rolfing, shiatsu, Swedish massage therapy, Trager, visceral manipulation, massage, Asian bodywork therapy, biodynamic craniosacral therapy, Jin Shin Do Bodymind Acupressure, polarity, polarity bodywork, Polarity Therapy bodywork, qigong, Reiki, tuina, Rolfing Structural Integration, Feldenkrais method of somatic education, Trager approach to movement education, body-mind centering, ortho-bionomy and reflexology.(2) The term does not include an activity that takes place in any of the following:(i) A training room of a public or private school accredited by the Department of Education.(ii) A training room of a recognized professional or amateur athletic team.(iii) An office, clinic or other facility at which medical professionals licensed by the Commonwealth provide bodywork to the public in the ordinary course of their medical profession.(iv) A medical facility licensed by the Commonwealth.(v) A place of business where a licensed massage therapist or other bodywork practitioner works as a solo practitioner and complies with all of the requirements of this act and:(A) does not use a business name or assumed name; or20250HB0663PN0670 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (B) uses a business name or an assumed name, but also provides the practitioner's full name or license number in each advertisement and each time the business name or assumed name appears in writing.(vi) A premises where a person exclusively practices techniques that:(A) do not involve contact with the body of the client; or(B) involve resting the hands on the surface of the client's body without delivering pressure to or manipulation of the soft tissues.(vii) A premises where services, including the topical application of products to the skin for beautification purposes, take place as long as the services do not involve direct manipulation of the soft tissues of the body."Bureau." The Bureau of Professional and Occupational Affairs in the department."Client." An individual who enters into an agreement for services for a fee, income or compensation of any kind in this Commonwealth."Department." The Department of State of the Commonwealth."Dormitory." A location in a massage establishment, other than a residence, where there are signs that individuals live there or are engaged in communal sleeping, including beds, mattresses or cots."Employee." An individual who performs a service at a bodywork facility on a full-time, part-time or contract basis whether or not the individual is designated as an employee, independent contractor or otherwise. The term does not include 20250HB0663PN0670 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 an individual who is exclusively engaged in the repair or maintenance of a bodywork facility or delivers goods to a licensee."Illicit bodywork facility." A facility that entices clients through advertising or other business practices directed toward sexual desires."Licensee." A person licensed under this act."Manager." An individual authorized by the licensee to exercise overall operational control of the business, supervise employees or fulfill a function required of a manager under this act."Massage therapist." An individual licensed by the State Board of Massage Therapy to practice massage therapy."Massage therapy." The application of a system of structured touch, pressure, movement, holding and treatment of the soft tissue manifestations of the human body in which the primary intent is to enhance the health and well-being of the client without limitation, except as provided in this act. The term includes the external application of water, heat, cold, lubricants or other topical preparations, lymphatic techniques, myofascial release techniques and the use of electro-mechanical devices that mimic or enhance the action of the massage techniques. The term does not include:(1) the diagnosis or treatment of impairment, illness, disease or disability;(2) a medical procedure;(3) a chiropractic manipulation, adjustment, physical therapy mobilization or manual therapy;(4) therapeutic exercise;(5) electrical stimulation;20250HB0663PN0670 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (6) ultrasound; or(7) prescription of medicines for which a license to practice medicine, chiropractic, physical therapy, occupational therapy, podiatry or other practice of the healing arts is required by law."Place of business." An office, clinic, facility, salon, spa establishment or other location where a person engages in the practice of massage or bodywork. The term does not include the residence of a therapist or an out-call location not owned, rented or leased by a bodywork practitioner or bodywork facility, unless the location is advertised as the bodywork practitioner's or bodywork facility's place of business."Spa establishment." A commercial facility that offers or engages in personal services that require a patron to disrobe or includes body wraps, hydro-mineral wraps, body polish, body wash, bath and hydrotherapy tub soak."Table shower." An apparatus for the bathing or massaging of a person on a table or in a tub. The term includes a Vichy shower.Section 3. Licenses required.(a) Facility license.--To operate a bodywork facility in this Commonwealth, the facility must have a valid bodywork facility license under this act.(b) Manager license.--To manage a licensed bodywork facility in this Commonwealth, the manager must have a valid manager license under this act.(c) Table shower license.--To operate or maintain a table shower on or about a licensed premises, the licensee must have a valid table shower license under this act.Section 4. Administrative duties.20250HB0663PN0670 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (a) Duty of bureau.--The bureau may issue, deny, suspend, revoke or take other administrative action to ensure compliance with this act and may promulgate rules and regulations in accordance with this act.(b) Temporary regulations.--In order to facilitate the prompt implementation of this act, the bureau shall transmit notice of temporary regulations regarding the implementation of this act to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin within 120 days of the effective date of this section. Temporary regulations are not subject to the following:(1) Section 612 of the act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.177, No.175), known as The Administrative Code of 1929.(2) Section 201, 202, 203, 204 and 205 of the act of July 31, 1968 (P.L.769, No.240), referred to as the Commonwealth Documents Law.(3) The act of June 25, 1982 (P.L.633, No.181), known as the Regulatory Review Act.(c) Expiration.--The temporary regulations under subsection (b) shall expire no later than 24 months following the publication of the temporary regulations. Regulations adopted after the 24-month expiration date shall be promulgated as provided by law.(d) Final regulations.--Within 24 months of the effective date of this section, the bureau shall submit final regulations to the department.Section 5. Application for license.(a) Bodywork facility license.--An application for a bodywork facility license shall include the following information:20250HB0663PN0670 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) If an individual, the age of the applicant.(2) The name, address, telephone number and Social Security number of each owner and director. If the applicant is an entity, the application shall include the name, address, telephone number and Social Security number of each individual applicant. The applicant shall include the Federal employee identification number and contact information for an accountant, attorney or registered agent of the entity.(3) Information pertaining to convictions or pleas of nolo contendere to a felony or misdemeanor in a Federal, state or municipal court in the United States involving prostitution, solicitation of prostitution, fraud, theft, embezzlement, money laundering, assault, sexual assault, crimes against children or human trafficking. Failure to disclose a criminal conviction may result in denial of the license application.(4) Information pertaining to a similar previously denied, suspended or revoked license in this Commonwealth or other jurisdiction in the United States. If the applicant had a license denied, suspended or revoked previously, the applicant must provide the name and location of the bodywork facility and the date of the denial, suspension or revocation.(5) Information pertaining to whether the applicant has been an officer, director, manager, partner, member or owner of a legal entity that currently or previously operated a bodywork facility and the name, dates of operation and location of the bodywork facility.(6) Satisfactory proof of the applicant's ownership or right to possession of the premises where the bodywork 20250HB0663PN0670 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 facility will be operated. The applicant has a continuing obligation to provide, if applicable, further evidence of the right to possession of the premises.(7) Proof of professional liability insurance.(8) Six months of bank statements demonstrating the source of funds for the applicant.(9) Bank credit references for any person with at least a 1% financial interest in the applicant.(10) A statement of purpose that the applicant has not been convicted of a felony under the act of April 14, 1972 (P.L.233, No.64), known as The Controlled Substance, Drug, Device and Cosmetic Act, or of an offense under the laws of another jurisdiction, which if committed in this Commonwealth, would be a felony under The Controlled Substance, Drug, Device and Cosmetic Act, unless the following apply:(i) at least 10 years have elapsed from the date of conviction; and(ii) the applicant has made significant progress in personal rehabilitation since the conviction and licensure of the applicant should not be expected to create a substantial risk of harm to the health and safety of the applicant's clients or the public or a substantial risk of further criminal violations.(11) The applicant agrees that, if a license is issued to the applicant under this subsection, the applicant will display the license prominently on the premises.(b) Terms of license.--(1) The bureau shall issue a license for a single, identified location and the license is not assignable or 20250HB0663PN0670 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 transferable.(2) The license shall be renewed yearly or at any time a change in ownership occurs, including the change of an owner or director from the original application.(c) Manager license.--A licensed bodywork facility shall have a manager who must hold a valid manager license. An application for a manager license shall include the following information relating to the manager:(1) The applicant's full name, including first name, middle name, last name and maiden name, if applicable.(2) The name the applicant wants to appear on the manager license, which shall be part or all of the applicant's legal name.(3) Current residence.(4) Mailing address.(5) City, state, zip code and county.(6) Social Security number.(7) City and state of birth.(8) Date of birth.(9) Telephone number, including home, mobile and business numbers.(10) Email address.(11) Trade name or business name, if applicable.(12) Business address.(13) Citizenship status.(14) Physical description, including gender, height, eye color, race, weight and hair color.(15) Place of residence for the previous 10 years, including the date, street address, city, state, zip code and county.20250HB0663PN0670 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (16) Professional experience for the previous 10 years, including date, job title, type of business, hours worked per week, employer's name, address, state, zip code, area code and telephone number and reason for leaving, if applicable.(17) Education, including high school, college or university or professional education, with the name and address of the educational institution, whether or not the applicant was issued a certificate, diploma or degree and the month and year of graduation.(18) Previous or current licensure, registration or certification in another state or territory, including state, license, registration or certification type, license or credential number, date issued and date of expiration.(19) Professional affiliations and achievements.(20) If any of the following situations have occurred, including an explanation of the situation:(i) The applicant was charged with, arrested for, convicted of or pled guilty or no contest to a violation of any law.(ii) The applicant had a driver's license canceled, suspended or revoked.(iii) The applicant has pending criminal charges in a state or jurisdiction.(iv) The applicant violated Federal or State law relating to bodywork or a health care profession.(v) The applicant obtained or attempted to obtain compensation by fraud or deceit.(vi) The applicant was involved in a civil suit related to the practice of bodywork therapy or other health care profession.20250HB0663PN0670 - 11 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (vii) The applicant has a judgment entered against the applicant.(viii) The applicant was denied a license for a health care profession.(ix) The applicant had a license revoked or suspended.(x) The applicant has formal disciplinary charges pending or action taken by a licensing board or medical board.(xi) If the applicant is a licensed massage therapist, the applicant's massage therapy license number.(xii) If the applicant has been convicted of or pled nolo contendere to a felony or misdemeanor in a Federal, state or municipal court in the United States involving prostitution, solicitation of prostitution, fraud, theft, embezzlement, money laundering, assault, sexual assault, crimes against children, human trafficking or domestic violence. Failure to disclose a criminal conviction may result in denial of the license application.(xiii) Disciplinary action taken for violation of a massage therapy licensure act in a jurisdiction of the United States. The applicant shall disclose this information whether or not the applicant is a licensed massage therapist.(xiv) If the applicant has been convicted of a felony under The Controlled Substance, Drug, Device and Cosmetic Act, or of an offense under the laws of another jurisdiction which, if committed in this Commonwealth, would be a felony under The Controlled Substance, Drug, 20250HB0663PN0670 - 12 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Device and Cosmetic Act, unless at least 10 years have elapsed from the date of conviction and the applicant satisfactorily demonstrates:(A) significant progress in personal rehabilitation since the conviction; and(B) that licensure of the applicant should not be expected to create a substantial risk of harm to the health and safety of the applicant's clients or the public or a substantial risk of further criminal violations.(21) An attestation under oath before a notary that the information on the application is true and complete.(d) Submission of application and payment of fee.--The application must be submitted to the board and contain payment of all applicable fees and one original color photograph of the applicant taken within six months preceding the date of the application of sufficient quality for identification. The photograph must be of the head and shoulders, passport type and two inches by two inches in size.(e) Display of license.--The applicant shall prominently display the license on the licensed premises. The license is issued for a single, identified location and is not assignable or transferable.(f) Table shower license.--The bureau shall promulgate regulations relating to the application and information required to obtain a table shower license. The following conditions must be met:(1) The applicant must have a license to operate the bodywork facility and a manager license.(2) The table must be commercial and professional in 20250HB0663PN0670 - 13 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 nature, manufactured with industrial grade materials and be designed solely for the purpose of massage utilizing multiple overhead spray nozzles and meeting all applicable plumbing and accessibility codes.(3) A massage bathtub and table must not have accessory sprays.(4) The bodywork facility where the table shower is being installed must be a bona fide spa establishment that offers, regularly conducts and markets a full range of spa services and treatments.(5) The bodywork facility must practice appropriate draping of clients to include the draping of the breasts, buttocks and genitalia of clients unless the client gives specific written consent to being undraped.(6) The license issued under this subsection must be displayed prominently on the licensed premises. The license is issued for a single, identified location and is not assignable or transferable.(7) The license must be renewed yearly.Section 6. Background checks.(a) Duty of bureau.--Prior to the issuance of a bodywork facility license or bodywork facility's manager license, the bureau shall transmit the application to the Pennsylvania State Police, the Department of Human Services and the Federal Bureau of Investigation for review and criminal history record information.(b) Time period for review.--The Pennsylvania State Police, the Department of Human Services and the Federal Bureau of Investigation shall return a report within 30 days after the application is submitted.20250HB0663PN0670 - 14 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (c) Limitation.--The Pennsylvania State Police, the Department of Human Services and the Federal Bureau of Investigation shall provide information to the bureau and may not approve or deny the application for a license.Section 7. Issuance and denial.(a) Requirements.--In order to be issued a license, an applicant must meet the following requirements:(1) The applicant shall be at least 18 years of age.(2) The following may not have occurred:(i) The applicant voluntarily surrendered a license to practice as a massage therapist or bodywork employee or operate a massage or bodywork facility as a result of, or during, a criminal investigation.(ii) A license to practice as a massage therapist or bodywork employee or operate a massage or bodywork facility was denied or revoked in a jurisdiction of the United States if the underlying violation would be a violation under this act.(iii) The applicant is a registered sex offender or is required by law to register as a sex offender.(iv) The applicant has a prior conviction for an offense under any of the following provisions:(A) 18 Pa.C.S. § 3121 (relating to rape), involving sexual misconduct with a child;(B) 18 Pa.C.S. § 3122.1 (relating to statutory sexual assault);(C) 18 Pa.C.S. § 3123 (relating to involuntary deviate sexual intercourse);(D) 18 Pa.C.S. § 3124.2 (relating to institutional sexual assault);20250HB0663PN0670 - 15 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (E) 18 Pa.C.S. § 3124.3 (relating to sexual assault by sports official, volunteer or employee of a nonprofit association); or(F) an offense under the laws of another jurisdiction which, if committed in this Commonwealth, would be a felony.(v) The applicant has convictions or pending violations for crimes, including prostitution, operating a prostitution enterprise, human trafficking, theft, embezzlement or money laundering.(3) The location of the potential bodywork facility has not had a similar license revoked or surrendered for cause within the last 24 months.(4) The character, record or reputation of the applicant, the applicant's agent and each owner or principal owner of the applicant demonstrates that no potential violation of this act is likely to occur if a license is issued.(b) Time period for review.--If the applicant meets all of the aforementioned criteria, the bureau shall approve the issuance of the bodywork facility or manager license within 30 days of the receipt of the completed application. If the application is not approved during the 30-day period, the application shall be deemed denied.(c) Reason for denial.--The bureau shall provide a written explanation for the denial of a license to the applicant.Section 8. Temporary license.(a) Bodywork facility license.--The bureau may issue a temporary bodywork facility license upon receipt of a complete bodywork facility license application and applicable fees, if 20250HB0663PN0670 - 16 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the license application is in conjunction with the sale of a licensed bodywork facility or a change in ownership of a licensed bodywork facility.(b) Manager license.--The bureau may issue a temporary manager license upon receipt of a complete manager license application and applicable fees, if the license application is in conjunction with the sale of a licensed bodywork facility or a change in ownership of a licensed bodywork facility.(c) Renewal.--A temporary license issued under this section shall be valid for 30 days, and the bureau may renew the temporary license every 30 days until the bureau approves or denies the application.Section 9. Prohibitions.A person in the business of operating a bodywork facility or a manager or employee of the bodywork facility shall not do any of the following:(1) Operate a bodywork facility without a valid license or with a license that has been suspended, revoked or expired.(2) Employ an individual to act as a manager at a bodywork facility who is not licensed as a manager or a licensed owner under this act.(3) Be open for business for the practice of massage therapy without a licensed massage therapist on the premises.(4) Operate or maintain a table shower on the premises without a valid table shower license.(5) Permit a licensed bodywork facility to be used as a dormitory or for housing, sheltering or harboring an individual or as living or sleeping quarters. The owner and family members of a licensed bodywork facility operated as a 20250HB0663PN0670 - 17 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 home occupation are exempt from this prohibition.(6) Engage with another person or give or administer a bath, including table shower, in a manner intended to arouse, appeal to or gratify the sexual desire of the individual receiving the service.(7) Permit an employee, manager or massage therapist to touch the genitalia of a client.(8) Allow an employee, manager or massage therapist to provide bodywork services without being fully clothed. During the delivery of all services the individual delivering the services shall wear fully opaque material that does not expose the individual's genitalia or substantially expose the individual's undergarments.(9) Require client nudity as part of the bodywork service without a client's prior written consent.(10) Place, publish or distribute, or cause to be placed, published or distributed, misleading or false advertising that would reasonably suggest to prospective clients that a service is available other than as authorized by this act. This includes language that reasonably suggests any other service is available.(11) Permit a licensed bodywork facility to advertise sexually explicit services or engage in sexually explicit advertising. Any sexually explicit advertising will be imputed to the owner and manager and is grounds for suspension of the bodywork facility license and the manager license.(12) Use, sell or possess adult-oriented merchandise, including sex toys, sexual aids, internal lubricant or contraceptives in any part of a licensed bodywork facility. 20250HB0663PN0670 - 18 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 The owner and family members of a licensed bodywork facility operated as a home occupation are exempt from this prohibition insofar as it relates to their personal and private living space.(13) Permit an individual to engage in a sexual act in the licensed bodywork facility. The owner and family members of a licensed bodywork facility operated as a home occupation are exempt from this prohibition insofar as it relates to their personal and private living space.(14) Fail to immediately report to the local police department or the Pennsylvania State Police disorderly conduct, criminal sexual acts, assaults or other criminal activities occurring at the licensed bodywork facility.(15) Permit a client to make an agreement with an employee to engage in sexual activity in any location.(16) Conceal individuals in the licensed bodywork facility or refuse to provide identification to inspectors or law enforcement, elude inspectors by exiting the licensed bodywork facility via doors or other exits or remain behind locked doors in the licensed bodywork facility during an inspection.(17) Permit anyone to perform massage therapy unless the individual is permitted under massage therapy law.(18) Operate between the hours of 10:00 p.m. and 5:00 a.m.(19) Operate an illicit bodywork facility.(20) Operate a place of business located in a building or structure with exterior windows facing a public street, highway, walkway or parking area that blocks visibility into the interior reception and waiting area through the use of 20250HB0663PN0670 - 19 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 curtains, closed blinds, tints or other material that obstructs, blurs or unreasonably darkens the view into the premises.Section 10. Requirements.(a) Duties.--A licensed bodywork facility shall:(1) Maintain a list of employees or contractors on site with employment start dates or contracted service dates, full legal name, date of birth, home address, telephone number, employment position and termination date, if applicable.(2) Maintain a copy of each massage therapist's license or other employee's license, if applicable.(3) Maintain a complete log containing the name of each client and the date, time, cost and type of service provided and the name of the employee providing the service. The log shall be kept for at least one year and shall be subject to inspection upon request by the bureau during normal business hours.(4) Operate or conduct business under the designations specified in the license.(5) Ensure that each employee, contractor, manager, owner or other individual, excluding clients present on the premises at the time of inspection, shall have a valid government-issued identification, passport or visa on their person and shall immediately present this identification upon request of an inspector or law enforcement.(6) Ensure that personnel on the premises shall remain fully clothed in opaque attire while performing services or while visible to clients on the premises.(7) Ensure that the interior and exterior doors of the licensed bodywork facility premises shall remain unlocked 20250HB0663PN0670 - 20 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 while the licensed bodywork facility is open. Exterior doors may remain locked if the licensed bodywork facility is owned by one individual with no more than one employee or independent contractor. Restroom doors may be locked and internal doors may be locked to protect confidential patient or business information.(8) If the inspecting official requests access to doors locked under this subsection during an inspection, open the doors immediately. A person who refuses to immediately open a locked door during an inspection is unlawfully operating or managing the bodywork facility under this act. Failure to comply or any delay may result in suspension of the bodywork facility license or manager license, or both.(9) List the address and license number of the bodywork facility in all advertisements.(10) Maintain a log, which shall be available for inspection at any time, showing the dates, times, hours worked and wages earned of all employees for at least two years.(11) Maintain a file of background checks under section 6 for each individual bodywork practitioner, employee or contractor that has been submitted to the Pennsylvania State Police, the Department of Human Services and the Federal Bureau of Investigation showing that they have not been convicted of or pled nolo contendere to a felony or misdemeanor in a Federal, state or municipal court in the United States involving prostitution, solicitation of prostitution, fraud, theft, embezzlement, money laundering, assault, sexual assault, crimes against children or human trafficking. Failure to maintain the file and update it every 20250HB0663PN0670 - 21 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 two years may result in suspension of the bodywork facility license.(12) Ensure that a bodywork practitioner, employee or contractor is not a registered sex offender or an individual who is required by law to register as a sex offender, have any prior conviction for an offense involving sexual misconduct with a child under 18 Pa.C.S. §§ 3121 (relating to rape), 3122.1 (relating to statutory sexual assault), 3123 (relating to involuntary deviate sexual intercourse), 3124.2 (relating to institutional sexual assault) and 3124.3 (relating to sexual assaults by sports official, volunteer or employee of a nonprofit association) or an offense under the laws of another jurisdiction which, if committed in this Commonwealth, would be a felony or have had any convictions or pending violations for an offense, including prostitution, operating a prostitution enterprise, human trafficking, theft, embezzlement or money laundering.(13) Ensure that a bodywork practitioner, employee or contractor has not been convicted of a felony under the act of April 14, 1972 (P.L.233, No.64), known as The Controlled Substance, Drug, Device and Cosmetic Act, or of an offense under the laws of another jurisdiction which, if committed in this Commonwealth, would be a felony under The Controlled Substance, Drug, Device and Cosmetic Act unless at least 10 years have elapsed from the date of conviction and the applicant satisfactorily demonstrates that:(i) the bodywork practitioner, employee or contractor has made significant progress in personal rehabilitation since the conviction; and(ii) employment of the individual should not be 20250HB0663PN0670 - 22 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 expected to create a substantial risk of harm to the health and safety of the applicant's clients or the public or a substantial risk of further criminal violations.(14) Prominently display a list of all services offered and the charge for each service.(15) Maintain all documents, logs and reports required by this act on the licensed premises.(b) License void.--Upon the sale or transfer of interest in a bodywork facility, the license issued under this act shall be void and a new license application shall be required.Section 11. Inspections.(a) Inspections required.--An owner, manager, bodywork practitioner or other employee must immediately grant full bodywork facility access at any time the bodywork facility is occupied or open for business, to any individual who is authorized or required to inspect the bodywork facility by the department or the municipality in which the bodywork facility is located.(b) Scope.--Each room, cabinet or storage area shall be subject to inspection and shall be opened and unlocked.(c) Log book.--A licensed bodywork facility shall promptly provide the log book under section 10 to the inspector without delay.(d) Licenses.--An inspector may request to review the bodywork facility's manager's or massage therapist's license of any employee or contractor.(e) Identification.--An owner, manager, massage therapist, bodywork practitioner, employee or contractor shall present identification upon request of an authorized inspector.20250HB0663PN0670 - 23 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 12. Suspension and revocation of licenses.(a) Power of bureau.--In addition to any other violation under this act, the bureau may suspend or revoke a bodywork facility license if the bureau finds that a license was obtained through fraud, deceit or misrepresentation.(b) Summary suspension.--The bureau may summarily suspend a bodywork facility license, provided that a hearing is scheduled within 30 days, if any of the following occur:(1) The licensee willfully failed to disclose information required under this act.(2) The licensee knowingly permitted a person to perform bodywork procedures when the licensee should reasonably know that the person is not licensed but is required to be licensed.(3) There is reasonable suspicion that the bodywork facility is attempting to operate an illicit bodywork facility or prostitution enterprise, whether or not there is a violation of any other law, regulation or rule.(4) The licensee failed to permit an inspection during business hours.(c) Administrative fines.--If the bureau finds that a license was obtained through fraud, deceit or misrepresentation, the bodywork facility shall be subject to an administrative fine of not more than $1,000.(d) Appeal.--A licensee may appeal the suspension or revocation in accordance with regulations promulgated by the bureau.Section 13. Forfeiture.An illicit bodywork facility shall be subject to asset forfeiture under 18 Pa.C.S. § 3021 (relating to asset 20250HB0663PN0670 - 24 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 forfeiture).Section 14. Practice of bodywork on minors.(a) Parental presence required.--(1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), when bodywork is provided to a minor, the parent or legal guardian of the minor shall be present, regardless of the sex of the licensed or certified person performing the bodywork.(2) The minor may decline the presence of a parent or legal guardian only with the written consent of the parent or legal guardian.(3) The licensed or certified person shall confirm the identity of the parent or legal guardian.(b) Notice.--When a minor is to receive bodywork, the person providing bodywork shall provide notice to the parent or legal guardian of the rights under subsection (a). The notice shall be provided in written form and shall be posted conspicuously in the location where bodywork is provided.Section 15. Victims services.If the bureau finds that a bodywork facility is operating as an illicit bodywork facility, the bureau shall provide information to victims services through the Office of Victims' Services within the Pennsylvania Commission on Crime and Delinquency to the trafficked employees and the employees subjected to involuntary servitude. The victims shall receive services through the act of November 24, 1998 (P.L.882, No.111), known as the Crime Victims Act.Section 16. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0663PN0670 - 25 - 12345678910111213141516171819202122232425262728